Washington statutes.
RCW 35.61.020

Election—Resolution or petition—Area—Limitations.

(1) When proposed by citizen petition or by local government resolution as provided in this section, a ballot proposition authorizing the creation of a metropolitan park district must be submitted by resolution to the voters of the area proposed to be included in the district at any general election, or at any special election which may be called for that purpose.

(2) The ballot proposition must be submitted if the governing body of each city in which all or a portion of the proposed district is located, and the legislative authority of each county in which all or a portion of the proposed district is located within the unincorporated portion of the county, each adopts a resolution submitting the proposition to create a metropolitan park district.

(3) As an alternative to the method provided under subsection (2) of this section, the ballot proposition must be submitted if a petition proposing creation of a metropolitan park district is submitted to the county auditor of each county in which all or a portion of the proposed district is located that is signed by at least fifteen percent of the registered voters residing in the area to be included within the proposed district. Where the petition is for creation of a district in more than one county, the petition must be filed with the county auditor of the county having the greater area of the proposed district, and a copy filed with each other county auditor of the other counties covering the proposed district.

(4) Territory by virtue of its annexation to any city whose territory lies entirely within a park district are deemed to be within the limits of the metropolitan park district. Such an extension of a park district's boundaries is not subject to review by a boundary review board independent of the board's review of the city annexation of territory.

(5) A city, county, or contiguous group of cities or counties proposing or approving a petition regarding formation of a metropolitan park district may limit the purpose and may limit the taxing powers of such proposed metropolitan park district in its resolution in cases where the metropolitan park district is being formed for specifically identified facilities referenced in (a) of this subsection. The ballot proposition must reflect such limitations as follows:

(a) A city, county, or contiguous group of cities or counties may limit the proposed district's purposes to providing the funds necessary to acquire, construct, renovate, expand, operate, maintain, and provide programming for specifically identified public parks or recreational facilities that are otherwise authorized by law for metropolitan park districts. The ballot proposition must specifically identify those public parks or recreational facilities to be funded, which identification may be made by referencing a metropolitan park district plan that has been approved by the legislative authority of the city, county, or contiguous group of cities or counties proposing the formation of the district;

(b) A city, county, or contiguous group of cities or counties may limit the maximum levy rate that is available to such metropolitan park district to any levy rate that does not exceed the aggregate rate set forth under RCW 35.61.210(1). The ballot proposition must state the maximum regular levy rate.

(6) Nothing herein prevents a city, county, or contiguous group of cities or counties from proposing formation of a metropolitan park district that is not limited under subsection (5) of this section.

[ 2017 c 215 s 1; 2002 c 88 s 2; 1965 c 7 s 35.61.020. Prior: 1943 c 264 s 2, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6741-2, part; prior: 1909 c 131 s 1; 1907 c 98 s 2, part; RRS s 6721, part.]